District of Columbia statutes.
1-631.02

Cooperation with the United States Civil Service Commission.

Because of the statutory and administrative relationships in personnel administration between the District and federal governments, and to ensure that personnel records include information of importance to both governmental jurisdictions, the rules and regulations issued by the Mayor shall, insofar as is practicable, be consistent with civil service rules and regulations governing personnel records management in the federal service.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3102, 25 DCR 5740
This section is referenced in § 1-631.08.
1981 Ed., § 1-632.2.
1973 Ed., § 1-361.2.